District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.06

Boycott, coercion, and intimidation.

No person shall enter into an agreement to commit, or by a concerted action commit, an act of boycott, coercion, or intimidation resulting in, or tending to result in, unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, the business of insurance.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 106, 48 DCR 1225